District of Columbia statutes.
10-137.02

Name change.

The Department of Recreation and Parks, established by Organization Order No. 10, approved June 27, 1968, shall be renamed the Department of Parks and Recreation.

July 1, 1898, 30 Stat. 571, ch. 543, § 8
as added May 2, 2015, D.C. Law 20-271, § 301(b), 62 DCR 1884
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 301(b) of the New Columbia Statehood Initiative, Omnibus Boards and Commissions, and Election Transition Reform Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-7, Feb. 26, 2015, 62 DCR 2646, 21 DCSTAT 807).